District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-215.11

Severability.

Repealed.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 13, 23 DCR 9532b
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2382(a), 52 DCR 7503
1981 Ed., § 1-1151.
1973 Ed., § 1-861.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2382(a), (c) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Section 2382(c) of D.C. Law 16-33 provided: “(c) An order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law repealed by this section shall remain in effect under the corresponding provision enacted by this subtitle subtitle N of title II, §§ 2301 to 2391, of D.C. Law 16-33 until repealed, amended, or superseded.”.